Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1240
State investment officer; appointment; qualifications; salary; removal.

The council shall appoint a state investment officer. The appointment shall be subject to the approval of the Governor and a majority of the Legislature. The state investment officer shall be a person well qualified by training to administer and invest the money available for investment, and he or she shall have at least five years of experience in the management of investment portfolios. The state investment officer's salary shall be fixed by the council at not less than twenty-five thousand dollars per year. The state investment officer shall serve without term and may be removed for cause by the council.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 4, p. 2350;

Laws 1974, LB 396, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 4, § 2.